Utah statutes.
48-1d-1106.   Reservation of name.

(1)  A person may reserve the exclusive use of a name that complies with Section 48-1d-1105 by delivering an application to the division for filing.  The application must state the name and address of the applicant and the name to be reserved.  If the division finds that the name is available, the division shall reserve the name for the applicant's exclusive use for a period of 120 days.

(2)  The owner of a reserved name may transfer the reservation to another person by delivering to the division a signed notice in a record of the transfer, which states the name and address of the transferee.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

